New York, session 2025-2026, A6204.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 42-b to read as follows: 3 § 42-b. Adjustment of electric distribution company residential fixed 4 charge. 1. As used in this section "residential fixed charge" means any 5 fixed fee charged to residential customers of an electric, gas or combi- 6 nation electric and gas utility corporation, including, but not limited 7 to, (a) a fixed charge for distribution basic service, (b) a distrib- 8 ution customer service charge, (c) a customer charge, or (d) a basic 9 service fee which is separate and distinct from any distribution charge 10 per kilowatt-hour. 11 2. The department shall adjust each utility corporation's residential 12 fixed charge upon such corporation's filing with the department of an 13 amendment of rate schedules pursuant to article four of this chapter, to 14 recover only the fixed costs and operation and maintenance expenses 15 directly related to metering, billing, service connections and the 16 provision of customer service. 17 3. The utility corporation shall provide clear and transparent infor- 18 mation on fixed charges to residential electric, gas, or combination 19 electric and gas utility customers, including, but not limited to, the 20 specific costs and expenses included in the calculation of such charges. 21 The information shall be easily accessible to customers, including 22 through the corporation's website and billing statements, and shall be 23 provided in a clear and understandable manner. The corporation shall 24 also provide customers with notice of any changes to fixed charges, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03114-01-5 A. 6204 2 1 including the reasons for such changes and the impact on customers' 2 bills, in advance of the effective date of such changes. 3 4. The provisions of subdivisions two and three of this section shall 4 not permit or enable the department to cause a cost shift to other rate 5 classes. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.